New Mexico, session 2026, SB70.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. TEMPORARY PROVISION--UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME PILOT PROGRAM.-- A. As used in this section, "program" means the universal basic income pilot program. B. The "universal basic income pilot program" is created as a two-year pilot program administered by the department of health to evaluate the financial impact on a pregnant person of providing a universal basic income from pregnancy through the first year of life of an infant. C. The department of health shall develop an application process for participants to voluntarily enroll in the program. The program shall consist of a control group of participants and a test group of participants. Participants in the program shall: (1) be pregnant at the time of applying to participate in the program; and (2) have an income at or below one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level. D. The program shall begin on July 1, 2026 and shall end on June 30, 2028. The program shall proceed with the following limitations; provided that the control group shall not be subject to these limitations: (1) the department of health shall distribute to participants a universal basic income of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per month through the duration of the program; (2) participants shall receive home visitation from employees of the early childhood education and care department or an entity approved by that department; (3) participants shall complete surveys and research forms throughout the duration of the program; (4) participants shall attend prenatal care appointments with a health care provider as defined pursuant to the Public Health Act in a frequency recommended by the health care provider; and (5) if a participant fails to comply with the provisions of Paragraphs (2) through (4) of this subsection, that participant shall be placed in the control group for the remainder of the program. E. The department of health shall report the findings of the program to the legislative education study committee no later than December 1, 2028. SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 to conduct a universal basic income pilot program. Any unexpended or unencumbered balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. - 3 -